Washington statutes.
RCW 15.30.070

License renewal date—Penalty for late renewal, exception.

If an application for renewal of the license provided for in RCW 15.30.020 is not filed prior to September 1st of any one year, a penalty of two dollars and fifty cents shall be assessed and added to the original fee and shall be paid by the applicant before the renewal license shall be issued: PROVIDED, That such penalty shall not apply if the applicant furnishes an affidavit that he or she has not engaged in the business of operating a controlled atmosphere storage warehouse subsequent to the expiration of his or her prior license.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6049; 1961 c 29 s 7.]